Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The Oregon-Ireland Sister State Committee is created.
(2) The committee consists of nine members appointed as follows:
(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint one nonvoting member from among  mem-
bers of the Senate.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one nonvoting member
from among members of the House of Representatives.
(c) The Governor shall appoint seven members, including at least one  member repres-
enting each of:
(A) An Oregon institution of higher education;
(B) A statewide trade organization;
(C) Urban interests in this state; and
(D) Rural or agricultural interests in this state.
(3)(a) A member of the Legislative  Assembly appointed under subsection (2)(a) or (b) of
this section serves at the pleasure of the appointing authority and may  continue to serve as
long as the  member remains in the chamber of the Legislative Assembly from which the
member was appointed.
(b) Before the expiration  of the legislative term of office of a member appointed under
subsection (2)(a) or  (b) of this section, the appointing authority shall appoint a successor
whose term on the committee begins when the former member’s  legislative term of office
ends.
(c) If there is a vacancy for  a member appointed under subsection (2)(a) or (b) of this
section for any other cause, the appointing authority  shall make an appointment to become
effective immediately.
(4)(a) The term of office of committee members appointed under  subsection (2)(c) of this
section is two years.
(b) A member appointed under subsection  (2)(c) of this section is eligible for reappoint-
ment.
(c) If there is a vacancy  for a member appointed under subsection (2)(c) of this section
before the expiration of the term, the appointing  authority shall make an appointment to
become effective immediately for the unexpired term.
(5)(a) The committee may hold one or two meetings per calendar year.
Enrolled Senate Bill 961 (SB 961-A) Page 1
(b) Members may attend committee meetings in person or by  telephone, video or other
electronic or virtual means.
(6) A majority of the members of the  Oregon-Ireland Sister State Committee constitutes
a quorum for the transaction of business.
(7) Official action by the committee requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the committee.
(8) The committee shall elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(9) Members of the Legislative Assembly  who are members of the Oregon-Ireland Sister
State Committee are entitled to a per diem as provided in ORS 171.072 except  when members
are out of the United States.
(10) The Legislative Policy and Research Director  shall provide administrative staff sup-
port for one meeting of the Oregon-Ireland  Sister State Committee held before each visit
described in section 2 (2) of this 2025 Act and for one meeting held after each visit.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon-Ireland Sister State Committee established  under section 1
of this 2025 Act may:
(a) Organize activities for and host visiting delegations from Ireland;
(b) Organize activities for and participate in delegations visiting Ireland;
(c) Provide for the exchange of information between the State of Oregon and Ireland;
(d) Work with representatives of Ireland on joint projects; and
(e) Take all actions necessary  to coordinate and promote Oregon exports to Ireland and
Irish investments within Oregon.
(2) The Oregon-Ireland  Sister State Committee may visit Ireland at least biennially for
the purpose of fulfilling the objectives described in subsection (1) of this section.
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 961 (SB 961-A) Page 2